Hawaii statutes.
§708-833.5 Shoplifting. A person
convicted of committing theft by means of shoplifting as defined in section
708-830 shall be sentenced to the following minimum fines:

(1) In cases involving a class C felony, the minimum
fine shall be four times the value or aggregate value of the property involved;

(2) In cases involving a misdemeanor, the minimum
fine shall be three times the value or aggregate value of the property
involved;

(3) In cases involving a petty misdemeanor, the
minimum fine shall be twice the value or aggregate value of the property
involved;

(4) If a person has previously been convicted of
committing theft by means of shoplifting as defined in section 708-830, the
minimum fine shall be doubled that specified in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3),
respectively, as set forth above; provided in the event the convicted person
defaults in payment of any fine, and the default was not contumacious, the
court may sentence the person to community services as authorized by section
706-605(1)(d). [L 1979, c 202, §2; am L 1982, c 233, §1; am L 1986, c 314, §67;
am L 2016, c 231, §40]

Cross References

Civil liability for shoplifting, see §663A-2.

Unauthorized removal of shopping carts, see §633-16.

COMMENTARY ON §708-833.5

Act 202, Session Laws 1979, established this section to
provide minimum mandatory fines for shoplifting offenses, but has retained the
alternative of paying fines through court ordered public service work. The legislature
believed the public service work alternative preferable to the establishment of
a "debtor's prison". Conference Committee Report No. 72.

Act 233, Session Laws 1982, doubled the fines on persons who
repeatedly shoplift.

Act 314, Session Laws 1986, increased the dollar amounts of
the property involved in the offense of shoplifting. With the increase, the
dollar amounts will more accurately reflect current property values and
consequently the offense will warrant the level of culpability intended when it
was originally drafted. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 820-86.

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, amended this section to implement
recommendations made by the Penal Code Review Committee convened pursuant to
House Concurrent Resolution No. 155, S.D. 1 (2015).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next